Utah statutes.
41-6a-1404.   Stopping or parking on roadway outside business or residential district.

(1)  Outside a business or residence district, a person may not stop, park, or leave standing a vehicle, whether attended or unattended, on the roadway when it is practical to stop, park, or leave the vehicle off the roadway.

(2)  A person who stops, parks, or leaves a vehicle standing on a roadway shall:

(a)  leave an unobstructed width of the highway opposite the vehicle for the free passage of other vehicles; and

(b)  leave the vehicle so that other vehicle operators have a clear view of the stopped vehicle from a distance of 200 feet in each direction on the roadway.

(3)  This section and Sections 41-6a-1401 and 41-6a-1402 do not apply to the operator of a vehicle if the vehicle becomes disabled while on the paved or main traveled portion of a roadway in a manner and to the extent that it is impossible to avoid stopping and temporarily leaving the disabled vehicle on the paved or main traveled portion of the roadway.



Renumbered and Amended by Chapter 2, 2005 General Session

